Hawaii, session 2025, SB586.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that unabated greenhouse gas emissions, and resulting climate change and sea level rise, present an urgent and existential threat to citizens of the State.  The State has committed to mitigating the impacts of climate change.  Chapter 225P, Hawaii Revised Statutes, established a statewide target to become net carbon negative as quickly as practicable but no later than 2045.  In addition, the mayors from each county have pledged to reduce the State's dependence on fossil fuels by eliminating fossil fuels from ground transportation by 2045. These efforts, however, must be accelerated. The purpose of this Act is to advance the State's climate change mitigation commitment by requiring the State and counties to upgrade to zero emission buses by 2045. SECTION 2.  Section 51-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§51-1 Grant of powers.  Every county of this State may acquire, condemn, purchase, lease, construct, extend, own, maintain, and operate mass transit systems, including[, without being] but not limited to[,] motor buses, street railroads, fixed rail facilities such as monorails or subways, whether surface, subsurface, or elevated, taxis, and other forms of transportation for hire for passengers and their personal baggage. Every county shall have power to provide mass transportation service, whether directly, jointly, or under contract with private parties, without the county or private parties being subject to the jurisdiction and control of the public utilities commission in any manner. [The terms "mass transit" and "mass transportation" mean transportation by bus, or rail or other conveyance, either publicly or privately owned, which provides to the public general or special service (but not including school buses or charter or sightseeing service) on a regular and continuing basis.] Beginning January 1, 2045, any county operating mass transit services pursuant to this chapter shall not use or employ any motor bus unless the motor bus is a zero emissions bus. For the purposes of this section: "Mass transit" or "mass transportation" mean transportation by bus, or rail or other conveyance, either publicly or privately owned, which provides to the public general or special service (but not including school buses or charter or sightseeing service) on a regular and continuing basis. "Pollutant" means hydrocarbons, carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, nitrogen oxides, and lead. "Zero emission bus" means a motor bus that produces zero exhaust emissions of any pollutant and includes battery-electric powered buses and hydrogen fuel cell-electric powered buses, but does not include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails. This section shall not be applied so as to impair any contract existing as of the date of enactment of this section, or operative portion thereof, in a manner violative of either the Hawaii State Constitution or Article I, section 10, of the United States Constitution." SECTION 3.  Section 103D-211, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§103D-211 Procurement rules.  (a)  The procurement policy board shall adopt all rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to implement its provisions in accordance with chapter 91. The policy board shall not delegate its power to adopt rules. (b)  Regarding the procurement of motor vehicles capable of transporting more than fifteen passengers, the procurement policy board shall promptly adopt all rules necessary to transition to one hundred per cent zero emission buses as quickly as possible, but no later than January 1, 2045. As used in this subsection: "Pollutant" means hydrocarbons, carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, nitrogen oxides, and lead. "Zero emission bus" means a motor vehicle capable of transporting more than fifteen passengers that produces zero exhaust emissions of any pollutant and includes battery- electric powered buses and hydrogen fuel cell-electric powered buses, but does not include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails. [(b)] (c)  No rule shall change any commitment, right, or obligation of the State or of a contractor under a contract in existence on the effective date of such rule." SECTION 4.  Section 302A-407, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  Any school bus contract between the State and the contractor shall include a provision requiring the contractor to equip the contractor's vehicles with the signs and visual signals described in section 291C-95(d) and (g).  The contract shall also include other provisions as may be deemed necessary by the State for the safety of school bus passengers and shall include provisions requiring compliance with the rules and standards described in section 286-181.  Beginning July 1, 2025, the State shall not enter into any school bus contract for a term that extends past January 1, 2045, unless the bus that is the subject of the contract is a zero emission bus.  Beginning January 1, 2045, the State shall not enter into any school bus contract unless the bus that is the subject of the contract is a zero emission bus. For the purposes of this subsection: "Pollutant" means hydrocarbons, carbon monoxide, carbon dioxide, nitrogen oxides, and lead. "Zero emission bus" means a motor bus that produces zero exhaust emissions of any pollutant and includes battery- electric powered buses and hydrogen fuel cell-electric powered buses, but does not include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails." SECTION 5.  The public utilities commission shall amend the commission's administrative rules to encourage motor carriers to upgrade to zero emission buses by 2045. SECTION 6.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 7.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 8.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________